Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-822
Department; motor vehicles; use of gasohol.

The department shall, not later than July 1, 1980, implement a program of using gasohol as fuel in motor vehicles owned or operated by the department which are designed to operate on such fuel.

Laws 1979, LB 74, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 243.